Utah statutes.
63B-18-301.   Authorizations to design and construct capital facilities using institutional or agency funds.

(1)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use institutional funds to plan and design an ambulatory care complex;

(b)  this authorization and the existence of plans and designs do not guarantee nor improve the chances for legislative approval of the remainder of the building in any subsequent year; and

(c)  no state funds be used for any portion of this planning and design.

(2)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $64,445,000 in donations to plan, design, and construct a replacement and expansion of the Eccles School of Business Building, with 135,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project unless expressly appropriated for this purpose or approved in a general obligation bond bill; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(3)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $8,689,000 in donations to plan, design, and construct a renovation of the Kennecott Building, with 19,400 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(4)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $30,737,000 in donations to plan, design, and construct a Sorenson Arts and Education Complex, with 85,400 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(5)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $4,477,500 in donations to plan, design, and construct a Meldrum Civil Engineering Building, with 11,800 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(6)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the University of Utah may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, negotiate with a private developer to develop the Universe Project on land west of the university football stadium;

(b)  before entering into a contract with the developer, the university shall:

(i)  present the final contract terms to the Legislature's Executive Appropriations Committee;

(ii)  obtain the approval of the State Building Board; and

(iii)  the State Building Board may approve the agreement only if the university demonstrates that the contract terms will be a benefit to the state;

(c)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(d)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(7)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah Valley University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $2,650,000 in grants and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Business Resource Center, with 12,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(8)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah Valley University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $1,200,000 in donations and institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a track and field facility;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(9)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Utah Valley University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $600,000 in institutional funds to plan, design, and construct intramural playing fields;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operation and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(10)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  Southern Utah University may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $2,000,000 in donations to plan, design, and construct a baseball and soccer complex upgrade;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(11)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the Department of Natural Resources may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $3,000,000 in federal grants to plan, design, and construct an interagency fire dispatch center, with 10,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the department may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(12)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the Department of Natural Resources may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $7,500,000 in federal grants to plan, design, and construct a curation facility in Vernal, with 21,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the department may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(13)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the Department of Natural Resources may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $650,000 in federal grants to plan, design, and construct an expansion to the seed warehouse at the Great Basin Research Center, with 9,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project unless expressly appropriated for this purpose; and

(c)  the department may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.

(14)  The Legislature intends that:

(a)  the Department of Veterans' Affairs may, subject to requirements in Title 63A, Chapter 5, State Building Board - Division of Facilities Construction and Management, use $3,500,000 in federal grants to plan, design, and construct improvements at the Veterans' Cemetery, with 15,000 new square feet;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project unless expressly appropriated for this purpose; and

(c)  the department may not request state funds for operation and maintenance costs or capital improvements.



Enacted by Chapter 134, 2009 General Session

